apertium-yid.yid.twol
Alphabet
 א אַ אָ ב בּ בֿ ג ד ה ו וּ ז ח חּ ט י יִ ך כ כּ ל ם מ ן נ ס ע ף פ פּ פֿ ץ צ ק ר שׁ שׂ ש ת תּ װ ױ ײ ײַ יי וו
 ׳ ״
 ·ּ ־ 
 %{ь%}:0 %{ь2%}:0 %>:0 %{ױ%}:ױ %{ע%}:0 %{ס%}:ס %{ן%}:ן
 
 ;

Sets

Vowel = אַ אָ יִ י ו וּ ע ױ ײ ײַ %{ױ%} ;

Cons = א ב בּ בֿ ג ד ה ז ח חּ ט י ך כ כּ ל ם מ ן נ ס ף פ פּ פֿ ץ צ ק ר ש שׂ ת תּ װ ;

Rules 

!!!!!!!! ORTHOGRAPHIC RULES !!!!!!!!

"Change final letters to non-final when not word-final"
Cx:Cy <=> _ :0* [ :Cons | :Vowel ] ;
      where
          Cx in ( ם ן ך ף ץ )
          Cy in ( מ נ כ פֿ צ )
      matched ;

"Change non-final letters to non-final when word-final"
Cx:Cy <=> _ .#. ;
      where
          Cx in ( מ נ כ פ פֿ צ )
          Cy in ( ם ן ך ף ף ץ )
      matched ;



!!!!!!!! CONSONANT RULES !!!!!!!!

"Delete final ט of verb stems when ט follows"
ט:0 <=> _ %>: :ט .#. ;

"Delete final ס of verb stems when ס follows"
ס:0 <=> _ %>: :ס :ט .#. ;

"Final ן is ם after stems ending with ן or vowels"
%{ן%}:ם <=> ן: %>: %{ע%}: _ .#. ;
            [ :ײַ | :ו ] %>: %{ע%}: _ .#. ;

!@ מ ײַ ן:נ %>:0 %{ע%}:ע ן:ם ;
!! בײַם, צום

"Delete ס after another ס"
%{ס%}:0 <=> :ס/:0* _ ;

!!!!!!!! VOWEL RULES !!!!!!!!

"Epenthesise ע as needed"
%{ע%}:ע <=> [ [ :נ :ג ] | :מ | :נ | :ל ]/:0 _ [ ן: | %{ן%}: ] ;  ! after ל, מ, נ, נג in ן suffixes
            [ :מ | :ײַ | :ו ]/:0 _ :נ ;       ! after ײַ and מ in pprs


!!!!!!!! UMLAUT RULES !!!!!!!!


"Umlaut first vowel of words if {ь} occurs later in word"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. :Cons* _ [ :Cons | :Vowel | [ :0 - [ %{ь%}: | %{ь2%}: ] ] ]* %{ь%}:0 ;
      where
           Vx in ( ױ א אַ אָ ו וּ %{ױ%} )
           Vy in ( ײַ ע ע ע י י ײ )
      matched ;

"Umlaut first vowel of words if {ь2} occurs later in word"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. :Cons* _ [ :Cons | :Vowel | [ :0 - [ %{ь2%}: | %{ь%}: ] ] ]* %{ь2%}:0 ;
      except
          .#. :י _ [ :Cons | :Vowel | [ :0 - [ %{ь2%}: | %{ь%}: ] ] ]* %{ь2%}:0 ;
      where
           Vx in ( ױ אַ ו ײ )
           Vy in ( ע ע י ע )
      matched ;

"Umlaut first vowel of words if {ь2} occurs later in word after י"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. :י _ [ :Cons | :Vowel | [ :0 - [ %{ь2%}: | %{ь%}: ] ] ]* %{ь2%}:0 ;
      where
           Vx in ( ױ אַ ו ײ )
           Vy in ( ע ע יִ ע )
      matched ;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
